West Virginia, session 2026, HB4989.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 15 Fire Fighting; Fire Companies and Departments; Civil Service for Paid Fire Departments. §8-15-10c. Cancer Screening for Paid Firefighters. A municipality with an established full-time paid fire department in accordance with §8-15-9 of this code, who offers health insurance shall ensure that the insurance covers cancer screenings as recommended by the NFPA 1582 Standard on Comprehensive Occupational Medical Program for Fire Departments, or the latest iteration thereof. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home